North Carolina statutes. Chapter 32A. Powers of Attorney.
Article 2. Durable Power of Attorney.

§§ 32A-8 through 32A-14.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018.

History.

G.S. 32A-8

; 1983, c. 626, s. 1; 1991, c. 173, s. 1; repealed by 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018. G.S. 32A-9; 1983, c. 626, s. 1; 1987, c. 77, s. 2; repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018. G.S. 32A-10; 1983, c. 626, s. 1; repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018. G.S. 32A-11; 1983, c. 626, s. 1; 2004-139, s. 3; repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018. G.S. 32A-12; 1983, c. 626, s. 1; repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018. G.S. 32A-13; 1983, c. 626, s. 1; 1991, c. 173, s. 2; repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018.

G.S. 32A-14

; 1983, c. 626, s. 1; 1985, c. 609, s. 5; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 992, s. 1; 2007-106, s. 1.2; 2007-484, s. 39; repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018.

Cross References.

For similar current provisions, see the North Carolina Uniform Power of Attorney Act,

G.S. 32C-1-101

et seq.

Editor’s Note.

Former G.S. 32A-9 pertained to the registered durable power of attorney not affected by incapacity or mental incompetence. Former G.S. 32A-10 pertained to relation of attorney-in-fact to court-appointed fiduciary. Former G.S. 32A-11 pertained to file with clerk, records, inventories, accounts, fees, and commissions. Former G.S. 32A-12 pertained to appointment, resignation, removal, and substitutions. Former G.S. 32A-13 pertained to revocation. Former

G.S. 32A-14

pertained to powers of attorney executed under the provisions of

G.S. 47-115.1

; reference to Chapter 32B; limitations on authority.